District of Columbia statutes.
42-702

“Grant” or “bargain and sell” passes whole estate and interest.

The word “grant,” and the phrase “bargain and sell,” or any other words purporting to transfer the whole estate shall be construed to pass the whole estate and interest in the property described, unless there be limitations or reservations showing a different intent.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1268, ch. 854, § 503
June 30, 1902, 32 Stat. 531, ch. 1329
1981 Ed., § 45-402.
1973 Ed., § 45-202.